District of Columbia statutes.
22-1405

False personation of inspector of departments of District.

It shall be unlawful for any person in the District of Columbia to falsely represent himself or herself as being an inspector of the Department of Human Services of said District, or an inspector of any department of the District government; and any person so offending shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall be punished by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $50 for the 1st offense, and for each subsequent offense by a fine of not less than $50 and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or imprisonment in the Jail of the District not exceeding 6 months, or both, in the discretion of the court.

Mar. 2, 1897, 29 Stat. 619, ch. 364
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 218, 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-1305.
1973 Ed., § 22-1305.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “nor more than $100”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 218 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.